District of Columbia statutes.
23-531

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Seized-currency” means moneys, coins, or negotiable instrument with monetary value, including personal checks, commercial checks, cashiers’ checks, travelers’ checks, bearer bonds, or money orders, seized by the Metropolitan Police Department or other District of Columbia law enforcement agency pending criminal forfeiture or civil forfeiture proceedings.

(2)

“Independent evidentiary value” includes the presence of fingerprints, written notations; or dye markings, traceable amounts of narcotic residue or other identifying substance on currency, or the packaging of currency in an incriminating manner.

History

October 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 402, 47 DCR 4619